Rhode Island statutes. Title 10 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure in Particular Actions
Chapter 15 Receivers of Joint Estates

10-15-1.
Appointment to receive income from joint or common property.

Upon the application of any party interested, the superior court may and is hereby authorized to appoint receivers of the rents and profits of estates owned by joint tenants and tenants in common.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 267, § 1; C.P.A. 1905, § 1220; G.L. 1909, ch. 332, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 383, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 596, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-15-1

.

10-15-2.
Duties of receiver.

It shall be the duty of a receiver to take possession of and manage such estates, to lease the estates but not under seal, collect the rents due and as they become due, keep the premises in repair, and distribute the net income among the joint tenants or tenants in common.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 267, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 332, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 383, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 596, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

10-15-2

.

10-15-3.
Removal and replacement of receiver.

A receiver may be for cause shown removed by the court and another appointed in his or her place, upon the petition of any party interested in the estate.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 267, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 332, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 383, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 596, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

10-15-3

.

10-15-4.
Termination of receivership on notice by parties.

A receivership shall terminate upon notice in writing to the receiver by all the parties interested or their duly authorized agents or legal representatives.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 267, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 332, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 383, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 596, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

10-15-4

.